Florida, session 2026, HB743.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (5) of section
456.52, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
456.52 Sex-reassignment prescriptions and procedures;
prohibitions; informed consent.—
(5)
(b) Any health care practitioner who willfully or actively
participates, or any other person who knowingly aids or abets a
health care practitioner to participate, in a violation of
subsection (1) commits a felony of the third degree, punishable
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb743-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 743 2026
as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
Section 2. Subsection (5) is added to section 766.318,
Florida Statutes, to read:
766.318 Civil liability for provision of sex-reassignment
prescriptions or procedures to minors.—
(5)(a) The Attorney General may conduct an investigation
and bring a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction
against a health care practitioner, as defined in s. 456.001, or
against any other person who knowingly aids or abets a health
care practitioner, for damages, injunctive relief, and civil
penalties of up to $100,000 for each violation of s. 456.52(1),
and each violation of s. 1014.04(e) and (f) or s. 1014.06
related to providing sex-reassignment prescriptions and
procedures to a minor.
(b) Any damages collected under this subsection must
accrue to the benefit of the injured minor.
(c) This subsection does not apply to:
1. Treatment with sex-reassignment prescriptions if such
treatment is consistent with s. 456.001(9)(a)1. or 2. and was
commenced on or before, and is still active on, May 17, 2023.
2. Sex-reassignment prescriptions or procedures that were
ceased or completed on or before May 17, 2023.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb743-02-c2